lt-LT: Fazės tipas: Vienfazis; Trifazis; Dvifazis; Kita
nb: Fasetype: Enfas; Trefas; Tofas; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta faze: Enofazni; Trifazni; Dvofazni; Drugo
ja: 相の種類: 単相; 三相; 二相; その他
bg-BG: Тип фаза: Еднофазен; Трифазен; Двуфазен; Други
th: ประเภทเฟส: เฟสเดียว; สามเฟส; สองเฟส; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de fase: Fase única; Trifásico; Bifásico; Otros
el: Τύπος φάσης: Μονοφασικό; Τριφασικό; Διφασικό; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de fase: Monofásico; Trifásico; Bifásico; Outro
sv: Fastyp: Enfas; Trefas; Tvåfas; Övrigt
hu: Fázistípus: Egyfázisú; Háromfázisú; Kétfázisú; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de fase: Monofásico; Trifásico; Bifásico; Outro
en: Phase type: Single-phase; Three-phase; Two-phase; Other
it: Tipo di fase: Monofase; Trifase; Bifase; Altro
zh-CN: 相位类型: 单相; 三相; 两相; 其他
da: Fasetype: Enkeltfaset; Tre-faset; To-faset; Andet
tr: Faz türü: Tek fazlı; Üç fazlı; İki fazlı; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de fază: Monofazat; Trifazat; Bifazat; Altele
de: Phasentyp: Einzelphase; Drei Phasen; Zwei Phasen; Sonstiges
vi: Loại thời kì: Một pha; Ba pha; Hai pha; Khác
fi: Vaihetyyppi: Yksivaiheinen; Kolmivaiheinen; Kaksivaiheinen; Muu
ru: Тип фазы: Однофазный; Трехфазный; Двухфазный; Другое
cs: Typ fáze: Jednofázový; Třífázový; Dvoufázový; Jiné
ko: 상 종류: 1단계; 3단계; 2단계; 기타
fr: Type de phase: Monophasé; Triphasé; Biphasé; Autre
sk-SK: Typ fázy: Jednofázový; Trojfázový; Dvojfázový; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta faze: Jednofazno; Trofazno; Dvofazno; Ostalo
zh-TW: 相位類型: 單相; 三相; 二相; 其他
nl: Fasetype: Eenfasig; Driefasig; Tweefasig; Andere
pl: Typ fazy: Jednofazowy; Trójfazowy; Dwufazowy; Inne